Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297I.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Surcharge. Each insurer engaged in the writing of policies of automobile insurance shall collect a surcharge, at the rate of 50 cents per vehicle for every six months of coverage, on each policy of automobile insurance providing comprehensive insurance coverage issued or renewed in this state. The surcharge may not be considered premium for any purpose, including the computation of premium tax or agents' commissions. The amount of the surcharge must be separately stated on either a billing or policy declaration sent to an insured. Insurers shall remit the revenue derived from this surcharge to the commissioner of revenue for purposes of the automobile theft prevention program described in section 65B.84. For purposes of this subdivision, "policy of automobile insurance" has the meaning given it in section 65B.14, covering only the following types of vehicles as defined in section 168.002: (1) a passenger automobile; (2) a pickup truck; (3) a van deleted text begin but not commuter vans as defined in section 168.126deleted text end ; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) a motorcycledeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5) a fleet; or new text end new text begin (6) a recreational vehicle. new text end deleted text begin except that no vehicle with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 10,000 pounds is included within this definition. deleted text end